Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7562.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4-1-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 4-1 entitled "Cruelty to
Animals" is hereby amended to read as follows:
4-1-22. Care of neglected animals by society — Forfeiture of owner’s rights —
Expenses.
(a) An animal control officer of a city or town, or an officer or agent of the Rhode Island
Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals may lawfully take charge of and shall provide
adequate care to any animal found abandoned or neglected or hazardously accumulated as defined
in § 4-1-1, or that in the opinion of that officer or agent, is aged, maimed, disabled, lame, sick,
diseased, injured, unfit for the labor it is performing, or cruelly treated, and shall give notice to the
owner or guardian, if known.
(b) Every owner or guardian, upon conviction, plea of guilty, or plea of nolo contendere,
of abandonment, neglect, hazardous accumulation as defined in § 4-1-1, or otherwise cruel
treatment of any animal taken charge of by an animal control officer of a city or town, or an agent
of the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals under this section, forfeits the
rights to ownership or control of that animal to the Society for disposition in any manner deemed
suitable for that animal.
(c) Whenever any animal control officer of a city or town, or an officer or agent of the
Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals lawfully takes charge of any animal
under this section, all reasonable expenses for the care and treatment of the animal(s), while in the

custody of the city or town animal shelter, or the Society during this time, shall be paid for by the
owner or guardian. The city or town animal shelter, or the Society has the authority to commence
a civil action for damages against the owner or guardian thirty (30) days after a written demand for
payment of the expense of the suitable care of that animal has been sent and no payment has been
received. The written demand shall state that the failure to pay or make arrangements to pay for the
care of that animal may result in forfeiture of ownership of the animal. The cost of the care and
treatment that is billed to the owner or guardian shall be reasonable and related to equivalent
services provided by veterinary care and animal sheltering, feeding, and boarding services in this
state.
(d) The owner or guardian of any animal that is in the charge of the city or town animal
shelter, or the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals pursuant to the
authority granted in this section may, within sixty (60) days following the date that the society city
or town animal shelter, or the Society gives notice of the taking of possession of the animal, petition
the district court for an order to return custody of the animal to the owner or guardian.
(e) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause a summons to be issued requiring
an authorized representative of the city or town animal shelter, or the Society for the Prevention of
Cruelty to Animals to appear in court at the time and place named, which summons shall be served
not less than fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing.
(f) At the hearing on the petition, the court shall consider:
(1) The animal’s condition;
(2) The care required to maintain the animal safely and in an appropriate environment; and
(3) The ability of the petitioner to provide or arrange for the adequate care of the animal,
including during the time any criminal charges related to or arising from the seizure are pending.
(g) If, after hearing, the court finds that the owner or guardian of the animal has the ability
to properly care for or arrange for the adequate care of the animal during the pendency of the
criminal charges, the court may allow the owner or guardian of the animal to have or arrange for
the adequate care, custody, and control of the animal pending the final determination of the related
criminal charges subject to such restrictions and conditions as the court determines to be reasonable
or necessary.
(h) All issues will be decided upon a preponderance of the evidence.
(i) In the event that the court orders an animal returned to the owner or guardian following
the hearing, the owner or guardian will not be required to pay for the cost of care incurred prior to
the date of the hearing unless and until such time as there has been a conviction, plea of guilty, or
plea of nolo contendere, of abandonment, neglect, hazardous accumulation as defined in § 4-1-1,
LC005009 - Page 2 of 4

or otherwise cruel treatment in the related criminal proceeding.
(j) In the event that the owner or guardian fails to petition for custody of the animal within
sixty (60) days of notice of the taking or fails to pay within sixty (60) days of the written demand
for payment, the city or town animal shelter, or the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of
Cruelty to Animals may petition the court for transfer of ownership of the animal to the city or town
animal shelter, or the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals. If the owner
or guardian fails to respond to the petition for transfer of ownership the court shall transfer
ownership to the society Society.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005009
========
LC005009 - Page 3 of 4